North Carolina, session 2025, HB965.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article I of the North Carolina Constitution is amended by adding a
new section to read:
"Sec. 39. Right to clean water, clean air, and a preserved environment.
All the people have a right to clean water, clean air, and to the preservation of the natural,
scenic, cultural, and healthful qualities of the environment, including the beneficial ecosystem
services a clean and healthy environment provides. The State shall protect these rights equitably
for all people. The State, including each branch, agency, and political subdivision, shall serve as
trustee of the State's natural resources, among them, its air, waters, coastal lands, wetlands, open
lands, native flora, native fauna, and soils, and shall conserve, protect, and maintain these
resources for the benefit of all the people, including both present and future generations. This
provision and the rights stated herein are inalienable and self-executing."
SECTION 2. The amendment set out in Section 1 of this act shall be submitted to
the qualified voters of the State at a statewide general election to be held in November of 2026,
which election shall be conducted under the laws then governing elections in the State. Ballots,
voting systems, or both may be used in accordance with Chapter 163A of the General Statutes.
The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment protecting the right of the people to pure water, clean air,
and a preserved environment."
SECTION 3. If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment
set out in Section 1 of this act, the Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement
shall certify the amendment to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall enroll the
amendment so certified among the permanent records of that office. The amendment set out in
Section 1 of this act is effective upon certification.
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
*H965-v-1*